Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1095.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "eligible hospital services," "global budget," "global budget model," "participant rural hospital," "participating payer" and "rural hospital transformation plan" in section 1403-D of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1403-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *"Alternative payment model." An innovative payment and service delivery model that is intended to reduce health care costs while maintaining access to care, improving the quality of care in rural counties and meeting the health needs of participant rural hospitals' local communities, and under which participating payers pay participant rural hospitals using an alternative payment methodology established by the authority.* * *"Budget." The prospectively set annual budget that is the basis for payment for each participant rural hospital for eligible hospital services by participating payers.* * *"Eligible hospital services." [All inpatient] Inpatient and hospital-based outpatient items and services. The term shall exclude all other items and services[, including the following:(1) Postacute care.(2) Professional services.(3) Durable medical equipment.(4) Dental services.(5) Noninpatient or non-hospital-based outpatient behavioral health services.(6) Long-term care services, except for swing bed services for critical access hospitals.] as defined by the authority.* * *["Global budget." The prospectively set annual budget that is the basis for payment for each participant rural hospital for eligible hospital services by participating payers."Global budget model." An innovative payment and service 20250SB1095PN1312 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 delivery model that is intended to reduce health care costs while maintaining access to care, improving the quality of care in rural counties and meeting the health needs of participant rural hospitals' local communities, and under which participating payers pay participant rural hospitals using a global budget methodology established by the authority.]* * *"Participant rural hospital." A rural hospital that has been selected and signs an agreement to participate in the [global budget] alternative payment model."Participating payer." A payer that operates in rural counties and, with respect to one or more specified products, programs or payment arrangements, signs an agreement with the authority to participate in the [global budget] alternative payment model.* * *"Rural hospital transformation plan." A description of the health care delivery system transformation that a participant rural hospital will undergo under the [global budget] alternative payment model, as approved by the board and the Federal Government when appropriate.* * *Section 2. Sections 1411-D(b)(8) and 1412-D(a)(1) and (b)(1), (5), (8), (9), (10), (11), (12), (13) and (14), Subarticle C heading of Article XIV-D and sections 1421-D(a) and (b), 1422-D(a) and (b)(2) and (3) and 1431-D(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 1411-D. Pennsylvania Rural Health Redesign Center Authority.* * *20250SB1095PN1312 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Composition.--The board shall consist of the following members:* * *(8) Two members appointed by the Governor who are nationally recognized experts in rural health care delivery or in developing and administering [global] budgets.* * *Section 1412-D. Powers and duties.(a) General rule.--The board shall exercise all powers necessary and appropriate to carry out its duties under this article, including the following:(1) Adopt bylaws necessary to carry out the provisions of this article. The bylaws shall include a provision addressing conflicts of interest as well as a provision that restricts board discussions and decisions necessary to [the administration of the global budget model as provided under subsection (b)] fulfill the purposes of this article.* * *(b) [Global budget] Alternative payment model.--The board is responsible for administering the [global budget] alternative payment model and shall:(1) Evaluate and select rural hospitals for participation in the [global budget] alternative payment model as a participant rural health hospital on the basis of diversity, vision and commitment to health care delivery transformation.* * *(5) Calculate, approve and administer [global] budgets. The [global] budgets may include payments for eligible hospital services provided under a participant rural 20250SB1095PN1312 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hospital's employee health plan.* * *(8) Evaluate the progress of the implementation of each participant rural hospital's [global] budget toward population health improvement goals and the cost of achieving health care goals.(9) Monitor [global] budgets and quality metrics for participant rural hospitals.(10) Provide an annual assessment of each participant rural hospital's compliance with its rural hospital transformation plan and [global] budget targets.(11) Require a participant rural hospital to submit a corrective action plan for failure to submit a rural hospital transformation plan, comply with its rural hospital transformation plan or meet its [global] budget targets.(12) Terminate a participant rural hospital from the [global budget] alternative payment model in accordance with the participant rural hospital's participation agreement.(13) Contract with an independent evaluation group to provide the board and executive director with an evaluation of the [global budget] alternative payment model's progress in the areas of population health, quality of care and cost targets.(14) Review and update the definition of "eligible hospital services" by transmitting a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin[, subject to obtaining all necessary Federal approvals]. The board shall use data collected under paragraph (3) in its review.* * *20250SB1095PN1312 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBARTICLE CPARTICIPATION IN [GLOBAL BUDGET] ALTERNATIVE PAYMENT MODELSection 1421-D. Roles of participating payers.(a) Letter of interest.--A payer may submit a letter of interest to the authority to participate in the [global budget] alternative payment model.(b) Agreement to participate.--As a condition of participation, a participating payer shall sign an agreement with the authority. The agreement shall detail the terms and conditions of participation in the [global budget] alternative payment model.* * *Section 1422-D. Roles of participant rural hospitals.(a) Letter of interest.--A rural hospital may submit a letter of interest to the authority to participate in the [global budget] alternative payment model.(b) Condition of participation.--As a condition of participation, the following shall occur:* * *(2) A participant rural hospital shall sign an agreement with the authority. The agreement shall detail the terms and conditions of participation in the [global budget] alternative payment model.(3) A participant rural hospital shall submit [annual] updates to its rural hospital transformation plan in the manner and form prescribed by the authority for review and approval.Section 1431-D. Data collection and retention.(a) Authority.--The authority may collect and analyze data from participating payers, rural hospitals, participant rural 20250SB1095PN1312 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hospitals and the department necessary to carry out the authority's responsibilities under this article. Data collected by the authority shall only be used for administering the [global budget] alternative payment model. The authority shall obtain the written approval of a participating payer, rural hospital, participant rural hospital or the department before the authority can use the entity's data for any other purpose. The authority shall retain the data for no more than seven years.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1095PN1312 - 7 - 1234567891011